Nebraska statutes.
Reissue Revised Statutes of Nebraska37-519
Use of aircraft, vessel, vehicle, weapon, or other equipment; prohibited.

It shall be unlawful for any person to use any aircraft, vessel, vehicle, snowmobile, or other conveyance, firearm, bow and arrow, projectile, device, radio, an electronic device, or other equipment in the commission of any of the acts prohibited under sections 37-516 to 37-518.

Laws 1978, LB 828, § 4;

R.S.1943, (1993), § 37-531;

Laws 1998, LB 922, § 239.